Vermont, session 2025-2026, H581.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. § 4283 is amended to read:
§ 4283. CREATION; IMPLEMENTATION
VT LEG #386242 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.581
2026 Page 2 of 3
(a) The Department shall maintain an electronic database and reporting
system for monitoring Schedules II, III, and IV controlled substances, as
defined in 21 C.F.R. Part 1308, as amended and as may be amended, that are
dispensed within the State of Vermont by a health care provider or dispenser or
dispensed to an address within the State by a pharmacy licensed by the
Vermont Board of Pharmacy.
(b) As required by the Department, every dispenser who is licensed by the
Vermont Board of Pharmacy shall report to the Department in a timely manner
data for each controlled substance in Schedules II, III, and IV, as amended and
as may be amended, dispensed to a patient within Vermont. Reporting shall
not be required for:
(1) a drug administered directly to a patient; or
(2) a drug dispensed by a health care provider at a facility licensed by
the Department, provided that the quantity dispensed is limited to an amount
adequate to treat the patient for a maximum of 48 hours; or
(3) a medication prescribed for purposes of reproductive health care
services or gender-affirming health care services, as those terms are defined in
1 V.S.A. § 150, unless the Commissioner determines that the reporting of those
medications is necessary to protect the public health.
* * *
VT LEG #386242 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.581
2026 Page 3 of 3
Sec. 2. 18 V.S.A. § 4288 is amended to read:
§ 4288. RECIPROCAL AGREEMENTS
The Department of Health may enter into reciprocal agreements with other
states that have prescription monitoring programs so long as provided access
under each such agreement is consistent with the privacy, security, and
disclosure protections in this chapter, and further provided that if the Vermont
Prescription Monitoring System contains any information regarding
medications prescribed for purposes of reproductive health care services or
gender-affirming health care services, as those terms are defined in 1 V.S.A.
§ 150, the reciprocal agreements shall exclude those medications and any
information about their prescribers, dispensers, and recipients from the
information to be disclosed to another state’s prescription monitoring program.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386242 v.1